District of Columbia statutes.
24-461

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Geriatric inmate” means a person 65 years of age or older convicted of a violation of a District of Columbia criminal law by a court in the District of Columbia, who suffers from a chronic infirmity, illness, or disease related to aging, and poses a low risk to the community;

(2)

“Permanently incapacitated inmate” means a person convicted of a violation of a District of Columbia criminal law by a court in the District of Columbia and who, by reason of an existing physical or medical condition which is not terminal, is permanently and irreversibly physically incapacitated, and who does not constitute a danger to himself or to society; and

(3)

“Terminally ill inmate” means a person convicted of a violation of the District of Columbia criminal law by a court in the District of Columbia who has an incurable condition caused by illness or disease which would, within reasonable medical judgment, produce death within 6 months and does not constitute a danger to himself or to society.

History

May 15, 1993, D.C. Law 9-271, § 2, 40 DCR 792
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 16, 44 DCR 1408

Section References

This section is referenced in § 24-462.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-261.
1981 Ed., § 24-261.